services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/ga_IE.dic
agallaim/HUA
agallainn/E
airgim/HUA
airginn/E
aisghabhaim/HUA
aisghabhainn/E
aisréadaim/HUA
aisréadainn/E
amharcaim/HUA
amharcainn/E
argainn/E
argónaim/HUA
atainn/E
atáirgim/HUA
athbheoinn/E
athchaithim/HUA
athchuirinn/E
athchumaim/HUA
athghabhainn/E
athghairim/HUA
athlíonainn/E
athnuaim/HUA
athraonainn/E
athrím/HUA
athsheolainn/E
athshonaim/HUA
báim/USA
ballbhascaim/USA
barúlaim/USA
beoghearraim/USA
bhacainn/EU
bhalcainn/EU
bharrtheilginn/EU
bhéicinn/EU
bhíogainn/EU
bhloghainn/EU
bholgainn/EU
bhreabainn/EU
bhreoinn/EU
bhroidinn/EU
bhrúchtainn/EU
bhuailinn/EU
bhuínn/EU
bladhmaim/USA
bloscaim/USA
borraim/USA
breacaim/USA
briogaim/USA
bróistim/USA
brúim/USA
buaim/USA
búirim/USA
caillim/USA
cáithim/USA
caochaim/USA
cartaim/USA
ceapaim/USA
ceolaim/USA
chailginn/EU
chaithinn/EU
chanainn/EU
charnainn/EU
chealgainn/EU
cheiliúrainn/EU
chineachainn/EU
chisinn/EU
chleachtainn/EU
chlóbhuailinn/EU
chloínn/EU
chnagainn/EU
chneadainn/EU
choillinn/EU
choincheapainn/EU
choirinn/EU
chomhairinn/EU
chomhbhualainn/EU
chomhlíonainn/EU
chomhshuínn/EU
chonduchtainn/EU
chornainn/EU
chraolainn/EU
chréamainn/EU
chrinninn/EU
chroithinn/EU
chruainn/EU
chuarainn/EU
chúlchoimhéadainn/EU
chumascainn/EU
cinim/USA
ciúáilim/USA
clingim/USA
clochaim/USA
clóscríobhaim/USA
cnagbhruithim/USA
cneáim/USA
coimeádaim/USA
coinnealbháim/USA
coiscim/USA
comhallaim/USA
comhdhéanaim/USA
comhluím/USA
comhthitim/USA
conspóidim/USA
cráim/USA
craosfholcaim/USA
creathaim/USA
críonaim/USA
cromaim/USA
cruanaim/USA
cúbaim/USA
cúltortaim/USA
d'adhmhillinn/EU
d'agóidinn/EU
d'aischuirinn/EU
d'aisíocainn/EU
d'aomainn/EU
d'atéinn/EU
d'athdhéanainn/EU
d'athoilinn/EU
d'athshuínn/EU
d'éinn/EU
d'éistinn/EU
d'fhaomhainn/E
d'fheallainn/E
d'fhínn/E
d'fhóirinn/E
d'fhorghabhainn/E
d'fhorshuínn/E
d'fhrithchaithinn/E
d'ibhinn/EU
d'imscaoilinn/EU
d'inscríobhainn/EU
d'ionnarbainn/EU
d'ólainn/EU
d'ungainn/EU
d'úscainn/EU
dáilim/USA
dearaim/USA
dearlacaim/USA
déroinnim/USA
dheargainn/EU
dhíbhinn/EU
dhíobhainn/EU
dhíscaoilinn/EU
dhlínn/EU
dhordainn/EU
dhruidinn/EU
díbholgaim/USA
díchumaim/USA
díolaim/USA
díospóidim/USA
díshiocaim/USA
diúlaim/USA
dochtaim/USA
doirtim/USA
dreachaim/USA
driogaim/USA
dúmhálaim/USA
éaraim/HUA
easmailinn/E
éim/HUA
eisiachtaim/HUA
eisilinn/E
éistim/HUA
fairim/USA
faomhaim/USA
feacaim/USA
feallaim/USA
feoim/USA
fháiscinn/EU
fheadainn/EU
fhiarainn/EU
fhóbairinn/EU
fhónainn/EU
fhormholainn/EU
fhriochainn/EU
fím/USA
floscaim/USA
fóirim/USA
foloiscim/USA
forghabhaim/USA
forluím/USA
forshuím/USA
freangaim/USA
frithchaithim/USA
gabhaim/USA
gaisim/USA
gealaim/USA
gearraim/USA
geitim/USA
ghairinn/EU
gheallearbainn/EU
ghiobainn/EU
ghlaoinn/EU
ghóchumainn/EU
ghráinn/EU
ghriollainn/EU
giolcaim/USA
glámaim/USA
gléasaim/USA
gluaisim/USA
goilim/USA
gortghlanaim/USA
greanaim/USA
grinnléim/USA
grodaim/USA
iaim/HUA
iascainn/E
idirghabhaim/HUA
imeascaim/HUA
imircinn/E
imscaoilim/HUA
iniaim/HUA
iniúchainn/E
inscríobhaim/HUA
iomlascaim/HUA
ionghabhainn/E
ionnarbaim/HUA
láibim/A
lámhachainn/E
lascaim/A
leanaim/A
leaschraolainn/E
leibhéalaim/A
léim/A
léirghlanaim/A
léirscriosainn/E
leithscaraim/A
ligim/A
línn/E
líonaim/A
lobhaim/A
logainn/E
loicim/A
longaim/A
luascainn/E
luím/A
mairim/SA
mascainn/E
meallaim/SA
meilim/SA
mhadhmainn/E
mheascainn/E
mhionghearrainn/E
mhúnainn/E
mionbhrúim/SA
móraim/SA
mórainn/E
mudhaim/SA
ním/A
nínn/E
oirim/HUA
painéalaim/USA
phainéalainn/EU
phlacainn/EU
phollainn/EU
phurrainn/EU
picilim/USA
pléim/USA
préachaim/USA
réamhghabhaim/A
reithinn/E
rillim/A
rionnainn/E
roisim/A
ruaiginn/E
sacaim/SA
saobhainn/E
scáinim/A
scalainn/E
scaobaim/A
scealpainn/E
sceonaim/A
scinninn/E
sciotaim/A
sclamhainn/E
scóigim/A
scólainn/E
scraithim/A
scríobhainn/E
scrúdaim/A
séanainn/E
seasaim/SA
seolainn/E
shaorghlanainn/E
shéidinn/E
shíobainn/E
shioscainn/E
shlíobainn/E
shnámhainn/E
shracainn/E
shuaithinn/E
sillinn/E
sínim/SA
siolpainn/E
siosaim/SA
slaodainn/E
sléachtaim/SA
sloinninn/E
smailcim/A
smolainn/E
smúraim/A
sníomhainn/E
snoím/SA
sparrainn/E
speachaim/A
spochainn/E
spólaim/A
sracainn/E
sramaim/SA
stadainn/E
stalcaim/A
stiúgainn/E
stiúraim/A
stríocainn/E
stróicim/A
suínn/E
súraicim/SA
taiscim/USA
teagascaim/USA
thaiscéalainn/EU
théachtainn/EU
thimpeallghearrainn/EU
thitinn/EU
thoghainn/EU
thonnainn/EU
threabhainn/EU
thrustainn/EU
tíolacaim/USA
tiúnaim/USA
toghairim/USA
tonnchrithim/USA
treaghdaim/USA
tuaim/USA
uaillinn/E
uamaim/HUA
urghabhainn/E
urghairim/HUA
